District of Columbia statutes.
26-531

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Account” means a demand deposit account, checking or negotiable withdrawal order account, savings account, time deposit account, or money-market mutual fund account.

(2)

“Financial institution” means the institution as defined in section 469A(d)(1) of the Social Security Act, approved August 22, 1996 (110 Stat. 2105; 42 U.S.C. § 669A(d)(1)).

(3)

“IV-D agency” means the organizational unit of the District government, or any successor organizational unit, that is responsible for administering or supervising the administration of the District’s State Plan under title IV, part D of the Social Security Act, approved January 4, 1975 (88 Stat. 2351; 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.), pertaining to parent locator services, paternity establishment, and the establishment, modification, and enforcement of support orders.

History

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 202, 48 DCR 1270

Temporary Addition of Section

Section 201 of D.C. Law 13-207 added this section.
Section 401(b) of D.C. Law 13-207 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 201 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 13-446, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 202 of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).